Massachusetts, session 194th, H4706.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 16GG the following 4 sections:- 
3  Section 16HH. For the purposes of this section and sections 16II to 16KK, inclusive, the 
4 following words shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following 
5 meanings: 
6  “Abusive treatment”, physical, verbal and mental abuse, including, but not limited to, 
7 bullying, either directed at or committed by individual home care consumers, surrogates, family 
8 members, other caregivers and any other individuals present in the home care consumers’ 
9 household when the home care worker is providing home care services. 
10  “Executive office”, the executive office of health and human services. 
11  “Home care agency”, any business, including a sole proprietorship, nonprofit 
12 organization or other entity that: (i) provides home care services to consumers in the consumers’ 

2 of 13 13 residences for compensation; (ii) represents itself as a home care agency by name, advertising or 
14 communications to the public, or uses the terms “home care agency” or “home care” in the 
15 entity’s name; or (iii) procures, offers, refers, provides or attempts to provide home care services 
16 by matching individuals seeking home care services to entities that provide home care services. 
17 “Home care agency” shall not include any of the following: (A) an entity operated by either the 
18 federal government or the commonwealth that provides home care services; (B) an entity that 
19 limits its business to the provision of house cleaning services; (C) an entity designated as an 
20 aging services access point pursuant to section 4B of chapter 19A; (D) a hospice program 
21 licensed under section 57D of chapter 111; or (E) a home health agency as defined in section 
22 51K of chapter 111. 
23  “Home care consumer”, an individual receiving home care services or any legal 
24 representative of such individual. 
25  “Home care services”, supportive services provided to an individual in their residence to 
26 enable that individual to remain in their residence safely and comfortably, including, but not 
27 limited to, assistance with eating, toileting, dressing, bathing, transferring, ambulation and other 
28 activities of daily living, housekeeping, personal laundry and companionship. “Home care 
29 services” shall not include any of the following: (i) hospice services provided by an entity 
30 subject to licensure under section 57D of chapter 111; (ii) home health services provided by an 
31 entity subject to licensure under section 51K of chapter 111; (iii) services provided by a personal 
32 care attendant in the commonwealth’s personal care attendant program as defined in 130 CMR 
33 422.000; or (iv) services provided under the MassHealth adult foster care program as defined in 
34 130 CMR 408.402. 

3 of 13 35  “Home care worker”, an individual employed by a home care agency who provides home 
36 care services to a consumer in the consumer’s residence. 
37  “PCA quality home care workforce council”, the council established in section 71 of 
38 chapter 118E.  
39  “Personal care attendant”, as defined in section 70 of chapter 118E. 
40  “Surrogates”, as defined in section 70 of chapter 118E. 
41  Section 16II. (a) No person or entity shall establish, maintain, operate or hold itself out as 
42 a home care agency, provide home care services or use the words “home care” to describe its 
43 services without a home care agency license issued pursuant to subsection (b); provided, that 
44 home care agency licensure shall be required for home care agencies that directly employ home 
45 care workers and home care agencies that contract with entities that employ home care workers. 
46  (b)(1) The executive office shall issue for a term of 3 years, and may renew for like 
47 terms, a home care agency license to any person or entity that the executive office deems 
48 responsible and suitable to establish or maintain a home care agency and which meets the 
49 requirements of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (e). A license 
50 issued under this subsection shall not be transferable or assignable. 
51  (2) The executive office may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew for cause a home care 
52 agency license. 
53  (3) License application and renewal fees shall be established pursuant to section 3B of 
54 chapter 7. 

4 of 13 55  (c) If the executive office determines a licensee has failed or refused to comply with 
56 requirements established under this section or the regulations promulgated thereunder, the 
57 executive office may: (i) deny an application for licensure; (ii) modify, suspend or revoke a 
58 license; or (iii) issue a fine of not more than $500 for each day of such failure or refusal to 
59 comply. Each day during which a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. 
60  (d) The executive office, in collaboration with the executive office of aging and 
61 independence and the department of public health, may conduct surveys and investigations to 
62 monitor and enforce compliance with this section. 
63  (e)(1) The executive office shall, in consultation with the executive office of aging and 
64 independence, the department of public health and the home care oversight advisory council 
65 established in section 16KK, promulgate rules and regulations for the licensing and conduct of a 
66 home care agency. 
67  (2) The executive office shall ensure that home care agency licensure, reporting and 
68 oversight requirements align with the licensure, reporting and oversight requirements across the 
69 long-term care services and support system, including home health agency licensure and 
70 provider monitoring conducted by aging services access points.  
71  (3) The regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to: 
72  (i) background checks for all home care workers which shall include, but shall not be 
73 limited to: (A) Massachusetts criminal background checks; (B) state or county criminal history 
74 checks for each location outside of the commonwealth in which the home care worker is known 
75 to have lived or worked during the previous 5 years; (C) a review of the federal Office of 
76 Inspector General List of Excluded Individuals/Entities; (D) a review of the nurse aide registry; 

5 of 13 77 (E) if applicable, a review of professional certifications or other credentials; and (F) for all home 
78 care workers who will transport home care consumers, verification of licensure, auto insurance 
79 and driving records for a minimum of the previous 5 years; 
80  (ii) minimum standards for consumer-specific service plans and contracts that home care 
81 agencies shall develop with home care consumers; provided, that the plans shall include: (A) a 
82 detailed description of services, including services the home care agency is subcontracting to 
83 another agency or provider; (B) a written unit rate and total cost of services, inclusive of any 
84 additional fees or deposits; and (C) home care agency contact information for consumer 
85 questions; 
86  (iii) minimum coverage requirements for workers’ compensation insurance and liability 
87 insurance for the home care agency; 
88  (iv) maintenance of a payroll process that follows all state and federal labor and wage 
89 laws for the home care agency; 
90  (v) annual and ongoing training and competency requirements for home care workers and 
91 home care agency staff that interact with home care consumers; provided, that minimum training 
92 and competency requirements shall include: (A) confidentiality and privacy rights of home care 
93 consumers; (B) infection control and communicable diseases; (C) handling of emergencies, 
94 including safety and falls prevention; (D) observing, reporting and documenting changes in 
95 home care consumer needs and environment; (E) identifying and reporting suspected abuse, 
96 neglect or misappropriation of property; (F) understanding Alzheimer’s disease and dementia, 
97 including person-centered care, activities of daily living, safety and dementia-related behaviors 
98 and communication; and (G) employee rights and remedies under the commonwealth’s wage and 

6 of 13 99 hour laws; provided further, that the trainings shall be culturally and linguistically competent for 
100 the trainee; 
101  (vi) policies and procedures to ensure home care workers have safe working conditions, 
102 adequate safety training and a process for submitting complaints; 
103  (vii) development and maintenance of an emergency preparedness plan; 
104  (viii) quality metrics and standards for services provided to home care consumers, 
105 including reporting mechanisms for tracking performance of home care agencies; 
106  (ix) annual reporting by home care agencies on quality and any significant changes 
107 related to home care agency finances; 
108  (x) requirements and written processes for the timely reporting of home care consumer 
109 complaints; and  
110  (xi) requirements for home care agencies to provide adequate equipment and supplies for 
111 home care workers. 
112  (f) The executive office shall: 
113  (i) review and process licensure applications, including a suitability review that ensures 
114 the applicant shall meet the obligations and conditions of licensure, including, but not limited to: 
115  (A) a review of the state debarment list maintained by the operational services division 
116 and federal Office of Inspector General List of Excluded Individuals/Entities;  
117  (B) a competency review where all individuals with at least a 5 per cent ownership stake 
118 in the home care agency shall submit the individuals’ names, contact information, companies 

7 of 13 119 where they have at least a 5 per cent ownership interest, any civil or criminal findings against 
120 said individual and a completed background check; and 
121  (C) a review to ensure that applicants have the financial capacity to provide ongoing 
122 home care services while maintaining compliance with labor and employment laws; 
123  (ii) establish a process for a change of ownership that includes advanced notice to home 
124 care consumers and home care workers and a review by the executive office to determine if the 
125 new owner can meet the obligations and conditions of licensure, including a suitability review;  
126  (iii) work with other state agencies to investigate and resolve complaints against the 
127 licensee; and 
128  (vi) publicly post a list of licensed home care agencies on the executive office’s website. 
129  Section 16JJ. (a) The executive office, in consultation with the home care worker and 
130 consumer abuse stakeholder advisory committee established in subsection (b), MassHealth, the 
131 executive office of aging and independence, the department of public health and the PCA quality 
132 home care workforce council, shall adopt minimum standards and procedures for addressing 
133 abusive treatment of home care workers, personal care attendants and home care consumers in 
134 the commonwealth. The standards and procedures shall: (i) address abusive treatment, including 
135 the connection between abusive behavior by home care consumers and disruptive behavioral 
136 disorders; (ii) promote appropriate training and support for home care workers, personal care 
137 attendants and home care consumers; (iii) ensure a safe and healthy work environment for home 
138 care workers and personal care attendants; (iv) recognize the privacy rights of home care 
139 consumers; and (v) recognize the responsibilities of the consumer-employers of personal care 
140 attendants.  

8 of 13 141  (b) There is hereby established a home care worker and consumer abuse stakeholder 
142 advisory committee within the executive office. The advisory committee shall advise the 
143 executive office on addressing abusive treatment of home care workers, personal care attendants 
144 and home care consumers, and shall periodically conduct studies and issue reports containing its 
145 findings and recommendations.  
146  (c) The advisory committee shall consist of the following 15 members: the secretary of 
147 aging and independence or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the assistant secretary for 
148 MassHealth or a designee; the commissioner of public health or a designee; the chairs of the joint 
149 committee on aging and independence or their designees; and 10 persons to be appointed by the 
150 governor, 1 of whom shall be a personal care attendant, 1 of whom shall be a home care worker, 
151 1 of whom shall be a consumer of personal care attendant services who shall be a member of the 
152 PCA quality home care workforce council, 1 of whom shall be a home care consumer, 1 of 
153 whom shall be a representative of the statewide independent living council, 1 of whom shall be a 
154 representative of the Disability Law Center, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a representative of 
155 Massachusetts Aging Access Association, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a representative of the Home 
156 Care Aide Council, 1 of whom shall be a representative of the Home Care Alliance of 
157 Massachusetts, Inc. and 1 of whom shall be a representative of the Local 1199 Service 
158 Employees International Union. The members of the advisory committee shall serve without 
159 compensation. 
160  (d) The advisory committee shall advise the executive office on minimum standards and 
161 procedures for addressing abusive treatment in the home care sector and shall periodically 
162 conduct studies and issue reports containing findings and recommendations, which shall include, 
163 but shall not be limited to: 

9 of 13 164  (i) reporting abusive treatment and debriefing after incidents of abusive treatment, 
165 including best practices for standards and procedures for reporting abuse to the home care 
166 workers’ employers or appropriate state entities, including, in the case of personal care assistants, 
167 the PCA quality home care workforce council or MassHealth, without retaliation and while 
168 retaining the right to report any criminal activity to law enforcement; provided, that the standards 
169 shall include, but not be limited to, best practices for a debriefing process for affected home care 
170 workers and home care consumers following violent acts; 
171  (ii) tracking and retaining records of abusive treatment, including best practices for 
172 standards and procedures for the executive office to track and monitor reports of both home care 
173 worker abuse and reports of home care consumer abuse or neglect; 
174  (iii) informing home care workers of potentially unsafe working environments, including 
175 best practices for standards and procedures requiring employers of home care workers or other 
176 appropriate state entities, including, in the case of personal care attendants, the PCA quality 
177 home care workforce council or MassHealth, to regularly inform home care workers of patterns 
178 of abusive treatment by home care consumers that may indicate a potentially unsafe working 
179 environment; provided, that the standards and procedures shall balance respect for home care 
180 consumer privacy with the need to protect home care worker safety and ensure continuity of 
181 care; 
182  (iv) employee training, including best practices for standards and procedures for home 
183 care consumer orientations and home care worker trainings on: (A) abusive treatment in the 
184 home care setting; (B) escalation cycles and effective de-escalation techniques; and (C) 

10 of 13 185 culturally competent and peer-to-peer trainings and strategies to prevent physical harm with 
186 hands-on practice or role play; and 
187  (v) employer internal policies, including best practices for standards and procedures to: 
188 (A) prevent abusive treatment among employees; (B) offer resources to employees for coping 
189 with the effects of violence; and (C) develop labor-management workplace safety committees.  
190  (e) The advisory committee shall submit a report containing findings and 
191 recommendations, including drafts of proposed legislation or regulatory changes to carry out its 
192 recommendations, with the secretary of the executive office, the clerks of the house of 
193 representatives and the senate, the joint committee on aging and independence and the joint 
194 committee on public health. 
195  Section 16KK. (a) There is hereby established a home care oversight advisory council 
196 within the executive office. The advisory council shall consist of the following 9 members: the 
197 commissioner of public health or their designee, who shall serve as chair; the secretary of aging 
198 and independence or their designee; the assistant secretary for MassHealth or their designee; the 
199 chairs of the joint committee on aging and independence or their designees; and 4 persons to be 
200 appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a representative of the Home Care Aide Council, 
201 1 of whom shall be a representative of the Home Care Alliance of Massachusetts, Inc., 1 of 
202 whom shall be a representative of Massachusetts Aging Access Association, Inc. and 1 of whom 
203 shall be a representative of Local 1199 Service Employees International Union. 
204  (b) The advisory council shall advise the executive office on the oversight of licensed 
205 home care agencies and shall assist in the development and implementation of regulations 

11 of 13 206 promulgated by the executive office pursuant to subsection (e) of section 16II. The advisory 
207 council shall advise the executive office on: 
208  (i) the process of implementing home care agency licensure requirements in the 
209 commonwealth pursuant to section 16II; 
210  (ii) existing licensure, reporting and oversight requirements across the long-term care 
211 services and support systems and other relevant state agencies, including the provider monitoring 
212 conducted by the aging services access points, to avoid duplication and conflicting requirements; 
213  (iii) developments and trends in other states relative to the licensure of home care 
214 agencies; 
215  (iv) processes to ensure that the home care agency licensure process shall align with 
216 licensure for home health agencies and with state oversight process already in place through the 
217 aging services access points, the home care worker registry established in section 4D of chapter 
218 19A and the nurse aide registry established in section 72J of chapter 111; 
219  (v) the development of a process for the commonwealth to conduct a statewide home care 
220 market analysis and report on current available home care services in all regions; and 
221  (vi) any additional subjects that the advisory council and the executive office deem 
222 necessary and appropriate. 
223  SECTION 2. Section 4 of chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
224 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- 

12 of 13 225  20. It shall be unlawful discrimination for any individual consumer of services provided 
226 by a personal care attendant, as defined in section 70 of chapter 118E, to engage in conduct 
227 described in subsections 1 to 3, inclusive; 4 to 5, inclusive; 9A; 11A; 16; 16A; and 19. 
228  SECTION 3. The executive office of health and human services shall promulgate 
229 regulations for the temporary licensure of home care agencies and shall issue temporary licenses 
230 for home care agencies within 180 days of the effective date of this act; provided, that the 
231 executive office shall issue a temporary license to an applicant upon verification that the 
232 applicant is currently contracted with an aging services access point or MassHealth. Such 
233 temporary licenses shall be valid until the date established by the executive office pursuant to 
234 section 5 by which entities providing home care services shall be licensed as home care agencies. 
235  SECTION 4. The executive office of health and human services shall, in consultation 
236 with the executive office of aging and independence, the department of public health and the 
237 home care oversight advisory council established in section 16KK of chapter 6A of the General 
238 Laws, inserted by section 1, adopt rules and promulgate regulations pursuant to subsection (e) of 
239 section 16II of said chapter 6A, inserted by section 1, for the licensing and conduct of home care 
240 agencies within 1 year of the effective date of this act. 
241  SECTION 5. The executive office of health and human services shall establish a date not 
242 later than 1 year after adopting rules and promulgating regulations pursuant to this act by which 
243 entities providing home care services shall be licensed as home care agencies. 
244  SECTION 6. The home care worker and consumer abuse stakeholder advisory committee 
245 established in subsection (b) of section 16JJ of chapter 6A of the General Laws, inserted by 
246 section 1, shall meet at least monthly in the first 6 months after the effective date of this act and 

13 of 13 247 shall file a report containing its initial findings and recommendations not later than 6 months 
248 after the effective date of this act. 
249  SECTION 7. Members of the home care oversight advisory council established in section 
250 16KK of chapter 6A of the General Laws, inserted by section 1, shall be named and the council 
251 shall commence its work within 60 days of the effective date of this act.